Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000 for
operations.
SECTION 1a.
In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $15,466,689, for the distribution of grants
specified in section 69, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 1b. In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon  Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,240,706, for the distribution of grants de-
scribed in section  303, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2022, for natural resource recovery actions
in areas affected by 2021 fires.
SECTION 1c.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon  Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,452,949, for the distribution of grants de-
scribed in sections 19 to 23, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2021 (second special session).
SECTION 2.
Of the moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945,  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall allocate
$9,000,385 to the Department  of State Police for fish and wildlife activities to implement Ar-
ticle XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 3. Of the  moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945, the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board shall allocate
$6,818,367 to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife for activities  and projects to imple-
ment Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. Of the moneys deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945,  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall allocate
$8,859,764 to  the State Department of Agriculture for activities and projects to implement
Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 5. Of the  moneys deposited into the Watershed Conservation Operating Fund
established under ORS 541.945, the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board shall allocate
Enrolled Senate Bill 5539 (SB 5539-A) Page 1
$4,908,369 to the  Department of Environmental Quality for activities and projects to imple-
ment Article XV, section 4b, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$9,228,766 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the  Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board from lottery moneys
deposited into the Watershed  Conservation Operating Fund established under ORS 541.945,
for operating expenses, activities and projects to implement Article XV, section  4b, of the
Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon  Watershed En-
hancement Board, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 971,210
(2) Grants ....................................... $ 23,190,935
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the Oregon Watershed Enhancement
Board, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 4,377,048
(2) Grants ....................................... $ 52,659,999
SECTION 9. (1) The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall establish by rule  a
process for allocating on a quarterly basis available moneys in the  Natural Resources Sub-
account of the Parks and Natural Resources Fund,  established under ORS 541.942, to fulfill
the biennial allocations made in this 2023 Act.  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, all quarterly allocations shall be set at one-eighth of the biennial allocations.
(2) If, in any quarter, the moneys transferred  from the Oregon State Lottery Fund to the
Parks and Natural Resources Fund are insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations  es-
tablished under subsection (1) of this section, the allocations shall be reduced proportionately
by amounts sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 10. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5539 (SB 5539-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5539 (SB 5539-A) Page 3